Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-296
Township organization; cessation; establishment of commissioner system.

When township organization ceases in any county as provided by sections 23-292 to 23-295, a commissioner system shall be established. The county board of commissioners shall have five or seven members as specified in the petition or county board resolution pursuant to section 23-293.

Laws 1885, c. 43, § 5, p. 236;

R.S.1913, § 1060;

C.S.1922, § 962;

C.S.1929, § 26-276;

R.S.1943, § 23-296;

Laws 1945, c. 42, § 2, p. 203;

Laws 2008, LB269, § 9.